Indiana, session 2026, HB1417.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
1 SECTION 1. IC 4-3-29 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
2 A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
3 PASSAGE]:
4 Chapter 29. Tort Reform Commission
5 Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "commission" means the tort
6 reform commission established by section 2 of this chapter.
7 Sec. 2. The tort reform commission is established as a
8 temporary executive branch commission to do the following:
9 (1) Review civil causes of action in the Indiana Code, civil
10 cases filed in Indiana, and tort reform generally, including a
11 review of the following:
12 (A) The constitutionality and the automatic adjustment of
13 damages in adult wrongful death cases and other tort
14 causes of action, medical malpractice claims, and punitive
15 damages.
16 (B) A comprehensive review of civil immunities in the
17 Indiana Code, including constitutionality of the immunities
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

2
1 and the effects of shifting liability.
2 (C) Indiana court statistics concerning civil torts.
3 (D) How the nonparty system affects litigation expenses.
4 (E) Data concerning the effectiveness of the current
5 Indiana Code and the trial rules to address the matters
6 described in clauses (A) through (D).
7 (2) Review data concerning the effect of tort reform measures
8 on public safety.
9 (3) Study the correlation between increases in medical costs
10 and cost of living and any increase in judgments awarded in
11 civil cases.
12 (4) Before November 1, 2026, issue a report containing its
13 findings and recommendations to:
14 (A) the governor; and
15 (B) the legislative council.
16 The report to the legislative council must be in an electronic
17 format under IC 5-14-6.
18 Sec. 3. The commission consists of the following fifteen (15)
19 members:
20 (1) The president pro tempore of the senate, or a designee of
21 the president pro tempore who is a member of the senate. The
22 president pro tempore or designee shall serve as a
23 co-chairperson of the commission.
24 (2) The speaker of the house of representatives or the
25 speaker's designee who is a member of the house of
26 representatives. The speaker or designee shall serve as a
27 co-chairperson of the commission.
28 (3) The chair of the senate judiciary committee.
29 (4) The chair of the house judiciary committee.
30 (5) The governor or the governor's designee.
31 (6) The chief justice of Indiana or the chief justice's designee.
32 (7) The minority leader of the senate or a designee of the
33 minority leader who is a member of the senate.
34 (8) The minority leader of the house of representatives or a
35 designee of the minority leader who is a member of the house
36 of representatives.
37 (9) Two (2) representatives of the Defense Trial Counsel of
38 Indiana, appointed by the governor.
39 (10) Two (2) representatives of the Indiana Trial Lawyers
40 Association, appointed by the governor.
41 (11) A representative of the Indiana Chamber of Commerce,
42 appointed by the governor.
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

3
1 (12) A member of the Indiana Hospital Association, appointed
2 by the governor.
3 (13) The commissioner of the Indiana department of
4 insurance or the commissioner's designee.
5 Sec. 4. A member serves for a term that ends on June 30 of the
6 next odd-numbered year following the member's appointment.
7 However, the member may be reappointed to subsequent terms.
8 Sec. 5. A member who is not an ex officio member serves at the
9 pleasure of the appointing authority.
10 Sec. 6. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be made in the
11 same manner that an original appointment is made. An individual
12 appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the remainder of the term of
13 the former member.
14 Sec. 7. Each member of the commission who is a state employee
15 is entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided
16 under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in
17 connection with the member's duties as provided in the state
18 policies and procedures established by the Indiana department of
19 administration and approved by the budget agency.
20 Sec. 8. Each member of the commission who is not a state
21 employee is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and
22 travel allowances paid to individuals who serve as legislative and
23 lay members, respectively, of interim study committees established
24 by the legislative council.
25 Sec. 9. Each member of the commission who is a member of the
26 general assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage,
27 and travel allowances paid to legislative members of interim study
28 committees established by the legislative council. Per diem,
29 mileage, and travel allowances paid under this section shall be paid
30 from appropriations made to the legislative council or the
31 legislative services agency.
32 Sec. 10. Except for expenses described in section 9 of this
33 chapter, expenses of the commission shall be paid from funds
34 appropriated to the governor.
35 Sec. 11. The commission shall hold meetings at the call of the
36 co-chairpersons.
37 Sec. 12. Nine (9) members constitute a quorum for the
38 transaction of business.
39 Sec. 13. Each member has one (1) vote.
40 Sec. 14. Action of the commission may be taken only upon the
41 affirmative votes of at least nine (9) members.
42 Sec. 15. The office of the governor shall staff the commission.
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

4
1 Sec. 16. This chapter expires June 30, 2028.
2 SECTION 2. IC 34-6-2.1-59.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
3 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
4 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 59.5. "Established public right",
5 for purposes of IC 34-11-10, has the meaning set forth in
6 IC 34-11-10-1.
7 SECTION 3. IC 34-6-2.1-132, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
8 SECTION 176, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
9 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 132. "Noneconomic damages", for
10 purposes of IC 34-30-29.2 and IC 34-51-1-4, has the meaning set forth
11 in IC 34-30-29.2-2.
12 SECTION 4. IC 34-6-2.1-174.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
13 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
14 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 174.5. "Public nuisance", for
15 purposes of IC 34-11-10, has the meaning set forth in
16 IC 34-11-10-1.
17 SECTION 5. IC 34-6-2.1-207.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
18 CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
19 [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 207.5. "Unlawful condition", for
20 purposes of IC 34-11-10, has the meaning set forth in
21 IC 34-11-10-1.
22 SECTION 6. IC 34-11-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
23 AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
24 JULY 1, 2026]:
25 Chapter 10. Limitations on a Public Nuisance Action
26 Sec. 1. The following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
27 (1) "Established public right" means a right, commonly held
28 by all members of the public, to the use of public land, air, or
29 water.
30 (2) "Governmental entity" means the state of Indiana or a
31 state agency and does not mean a political subdivision,
32 municipality, or unit.
33 (3) "Public nuisance" means an ongoing and unlawful
34 condition that proximately causes an interference with an
35 established public right.
36 (4) "Unlawful condition" means a circumstance that is
37 expressly prohibited by state or federal law.
38 Sec. 2. For purposes of this chapter, an action or condition that
39 is otherwise permitted by:
40 (1) a local ordinance;
41 (2) state or federal law; or
42 (3) a court order;
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

5
1 is not a public nuisance.
2 Sec. 3. (a) A public nuisance cause of action is available to a
3 governmental entity if the public nuisance is located within the
4 jurisdiction of the governmental entity.
5 (b) Unless otherwise set forth in statute, a governmental entity
6 may only bring a civil action concerning a public nuisance to seek
7 prospective injunctive relief for abatement of the public nuisance.
8 (c) A governmental entity may only recover damages that are
9 reasonably necessary to abate the public nuisance.
10 (d) A governmental entity may not recover money damages
11 associated with a potential future harm.
12 Sec. 4. (a) Only one (1) public nuisance action may be brought
13 against a defendant based on the same or substantially similar set
14 of facts.
15 (b) A defendant may move to dismiss a second or subsequent
16 public nuisance under subsection (a) if it is based on the same or
17 substantially similar set of facts.
18 Sec. 5. Unless otherwise set forth in statute, it is an affirmative
19 defense to a cause of action brought under this chapter that the
20 defendant does not have actual control over the source of the
21 alleged public nuisance.
22 Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this chapter
23 shall not affect a local administrative code or ordinance, unless the
24 local administrative code or ordinance:
25 (1) provides for a civil cause of action; and
26 (2) is in conflict with the provisions of this chapter.
27 (b) Nothing in this chapter supersedes applicable building codes,
28 fire codes, or public health and safety laws.
29 Sec. 7. (a) This chapter applies to a cause of action filed on or
30 after July 1, 2026.
31 (b) Nothing in this chapter applies to a cause of action filed by
32 a private person, individual, or entity.
33 SECTION 7. An emergency is declared for this act.
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

6
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Judiciary, to which was referred
House Bill 1417, has had the same under consideration and begs leave
to report the same back to the House with the recommendation that said
bill be amended as follows:
Page 1, delete lines 1 through 7.
Page 2, delete lines 24 through 32, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"Sec. 2. For purposes of this chapter, an action or condition that
is otherwise permitted by:
(1) a local ordinance;
(2) state or federal law; or
(3) a court order;
is not a public nuisance.".
Page 2, line 34, delete "unlawful condition is occurring" and insert
"public nuisance is located".
Page 2, between lines 38 and 39, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(c) A governmental entity may only recover damages that are
reasonably necessary to abate the public nuisance.".
Page 2, line 39, delete "(c)" and insert "(d)".
Page 2, line 39, delete "economic," and insert "money damages".
Page 2, line 40, delete "noneconomic, or exemplary damages or
costs".
Page 2, delete line 42.
Page 3, delete lines 1 through 11, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 4. (a) Only one (1) public nuisance action may be brought
against a defendant based on the same or substantially similar set
of facts.
(b) A defendant may move to dismiss a second or subsequent
public nuisance under subsection (a) if it is based on the same or
substantially similar set of facts.".
Page 3, line 12, delete "(b)" and insert "(c)".
Page 3, line 12, after "may" insert "only".
Page 3, line 12, after "following" insert "damages".
Page 3, delete lines 17 through 29.
Page 3, between lines 33 and 34, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), this chapter
shall not affect a local administrative code or ordinance, unless the
local administrative code or ordinance:
(1) provides for a civil cause of action; and
(2) is in conflict with the provisions of this chapter.
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

7
(b) Nothing in this chapter supersedes applicable building codes,
fire codes, or public health and safety laws.".
Page 3, line 34, delete "Sec. 6." and insert "Sec. 7.".
Page 3, delete lines 36 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 7. IC 34-50-1-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.117-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) If:
(1) a recipient does not accept a qualified settlement offer; and
(2) the final judgment is less favorable to the recipient than the
terms of the qualified settlement offer;
the court shall award attorney's fees, costs, and expenses to the offeror
upon the offeror's motion.
(b) An award of attorney's fees, costs, and expenses under this
section must consist of attorney's fees at a rate of not more than two
hundred fifty dollars ($250) per hour and other costs and expenses
incurred by the offeror after the date of the qualified settlement offer.
However, the award of attorney's fees, costs, and expenses may not
total more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000).
(c) A motion for an award of attorney's fees, costs, and expenses
under this section must be filed not more than thirty (30) days after
entry of judgment. The motion must be accompanied by an affidavit of
the offeror or the offeror's attorney establishing the amount of the
attorney's fees and other costs and expenses incurred by the offeror
after the date of the qualified settlement offer. The affidavit constitutes
prima facie proof of the reasonableness of the amount.
(d) Where appropriate, the court may order a judgment entered
against the offeror and in favor of the recipient reduced by the amount
of attorney's fees, costs, and expenses awarded to the offeror under this
section (or IC 34-4-44.6-8 before its repeal).".
Delete page 4.
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1417 as introduced.)
JETER
Committee Vote: yeas 9, nays 4.
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

8
COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Judiciary, to which was
referred House Bill No. 1417, has had the same under consideration
and begs leave to report the same back to the Senate with the
recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as follows:
Page 1, between the enacting clause and line 1, begin a new
paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 4-3-29 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]:
Chapter 29. Tort Reform Commission
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "commission" means the tort
reform commission established by section 2 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. The tort reform commission is established as a
temporary executive branch commission to do the following:
(1) Review civil causes of action in the Indiana Code, civil
cases filed in Indiana, and tort reform generally, including a
review of the following:
(A) The constitutionality and the automatic adjustment of
damages in adult wrongful death cases and other tort
causes of action, medical malpractice claims, and punitive
damages.
(B) A comprehensive review of civil immunities in the
Indiana Code, including constitutionality of the immunities
and the effects of shifting liability.
(C) Indiana court statistics concerning civil torts.
(D) How the nonparty system affects litigation expenses.
(E) Data concerning the effectiveness of the current
Indiana Code and the trial rules to address the matters
described in clauses (A) through (D).
(2) Review data concerning the effect of tort reform measures
on public safety.
(3) Study the correlation between increases in medical costs
and cost of living and any increase in judgments awarded in
civil cases.
(4) Before November 1, 2026, issue a report containing its
findings and recommendations to:
(A) the governor; and
(B) the legislative council.
The report to the legislative council must be in an electronic
format under IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 3. The commission consists of the following fifteen (15)
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

9
members:
(1) The president pro tempore of the senate, or a designee of
the president pro tempore who is a member of the senate. The
president pro tempore or designee shall serve as a
co-chairperson of the commission.
(2) The speaker of the house of representatives or the
speaker's designee who is a member of the house of
representatives. The speaker or designee shall serve as a
co-chairperson of the commission.
(3) The chair of the senate judiciary committee.
(4) The chair of the house judiciary committee.
(5) The governor or the governor's designee.
(6) The chief justice of Indiana or the chief justice's designee.
(7) The minority leader of the senate or a designee of the
minority leader who is a member of the senate.
(8) The minority leader of the house of representatives or a
designee of the minority leader who is a member of the house
of representatives.
(9) Two (2) representatives of the Defense Trial Counsel of
Indiana, appointed by the governor.
(10) Two (2) representatives of the Indiana Trial Lawyers
Association, appointed by the governor.
(11) A representative of the Indiana Chamber of Commerce,
appointed by the governor.
(12) A member of the Indiana Hospital Association, appointed
by the governor.
(13) The commissioner of the Indiana department of
insurance or the commissioner's designee.
Sec. 4. A member serves for a term that ends on June 30 of the
next odd-numbered year following the member's appointment.
However, the member may be reappointed to subsequent terms.
Sec. 5. A member who is not an ex officio member serves at the
pleasure of the appointing authority.
Sec. 6. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be made in the
same manner that an original appointment is made. An individual
appointed to fill a vacancy serves for the remainder of the term of
the former member.
Sec. 7. Each member of the commission who is a state employee
is entitled to reimbursement for traveling expenses as provided
under IC 4-13-1-4 and other expenses actually incurred in
connection with the member's duties as provided in the state
policies and procedures established by the Indiana department of
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

10
administration and approved by the budget agency.
Sec. 8. Each member of the commission who is not a state
employee is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage, and
travel allowances paid to individuals who serve as legislative and
lay members, respectively, of interim study committees established
by the legislative council.
Sec. 9. Each member of the commission who is a member of the
general assembly is entitled to receive the same per diem, mileage,
and travel allowances paid to legislative members of interim study
committees established by the legislative council. Per diem,
mileage, and travel allowances paid under this section shall be paid
from appropriations made to the legislative council or the
legislative services agency.
Sec. 10. Except for expenses described in section 9 of this
chapter, expenses of the commission shall be paid from funds
appropriated to the governor.
Sec. 11. The commission shall hold meetings at the call of the
co-chairpersons.
Sec. 12. Nine (9) members constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.
Sec. 13. Each member has one (1) vote.
Sec. 14. Action of the commission may be taken only upon the
affirmative votes of at least nine (9) members.
Sec. 15. The office of the governor shall staff the commission.
Sec. 16. This chapter expires June 30, 2028.".
Page 2, between lines 11 and 12, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(2) "Governmental entity" means the state of Indiana or a
state agency and does not mean a political subdivision,
municipality, or unit.".
Page 2, line 12, delete "(2)" and insert "(3)".
Page 2, line 15, delete "(3)" and insert "(4)".
Page 2, delete lines 39 through 42.
Page 3, delete line 1.
Page 3, line 13, after "Sec. 7." insert "(a)".
Page 3, between lines 14 and 15, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(b) Nothing in this chapter applies to a cause of action filed by
a private person, individual, or entity.".
Page 3, delete lines 15 through 40, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"SECTION 8. An emergency is declared for this act.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149

11
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1417 as printed January 27, 2026.)
CARRASCO, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 4.
EH 1417—LS 7115/DI 149